Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.130

Tax liens—City may protect assessment lien at foreclosure sale.

If any property situated in a local improvement district or utility local improvement district created by a city or town is offered for sale for general taxes by the county treasurer, the city or town shall have power to protect the lien or liens of any local improvement assessments outstanding against the whole or portion of such property by purchase at the treasurer's foreclosure sale.

[ 1995 c 38 s 2; 1994 c 301 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.49.130. Prior: (i) 1911 c 98 s 63; RRS s 9416. (ii) 1929 c 143 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 170 s 1, part; 1911 c 98 s 40, part; RRS s 9393, part.]

NOTES:

Acts of municipal officers ratified and confirmed—1995 c 38: See note following RCW 3.02.045.